Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.111

Inspection of dairy farms and milk processing plants—Violations—Director's access.

(1) The director shall inspect all dairy farms and all milk processing plants prior to issuance of a license under this chapter and at a frequency determined by the director by rule: PROVIDED, That the director may accept the results of periodic industry inspections of producer dairies if such inspections have been officially checked periodically and found satisfactory. In case the director discovers the violation of any item of grade requirement, he or she shall make a second inspection after a lapse of such time as he or she deems necessary for the defect to be remedied, but not before the lapse of three days, and the second inspection shall be used in determining compliance with the grade requirements of this chapter. Whenever there is any violation of the same requirement of this chapter on the second inspection, the director may initiate proceedings to degrade, suspend the license, or assess a civil penalty.

(2) One copy of the inspection report detailing the grade requirement violations shall be posted by the director in a conspicuous place upon an inside wall of the milk tank room or a mutually agreed upon location on a dairy farm or given to an operator of the milk processing plant, and said inspection report shall not be defaced or removed by any person except the director. Another copy of the inspection report shall be filed with the records of the director.

(3) Every milk producer and milk processing plant shall permit the director access to all parts of the establishment during the working hours of the producer or milk processing plant, which shall at a minimum include the hours from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m., and every milk processing plant shall furnish the director, upon his or her request, for official use only, samples of any milk product for laboratory analysis, and a true statement of the actual quantities of milk and milk products of each grade purchased and sold.

(4) The director shall have access to all parts of a dairy farm or facility that is not licensed as a milk producer or milk processing plant if the director has information that the dairy farm or facility is engaged in activities that require a license under this chapter. The director shall have access during the working hours of the dairy farm or facility, which shall at a minimum include the hours from 8 a.m. to 5 p.m. The director shall have the authority to take samples of milk or any milk products and water and environmental samples for laboratory analysis. For all establishments subject to this subsection and subsection (3) of this section, the director shall have access to records including, but not limited to, customer lists, milk production records, temperature records, and records of inspections and tests.

(5) If the director is denied access to a dairy farm or milk processing plant, the director may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for a search warrant authorizing access to the property and facilities for purposes of conducting tests and inspections, taking samples, and examining records. To show that access is denied, the director shall file with the court an affidavit or declaration containing a description of his or her attempts to notify and locate the owner or the owner's agent and to secure consent. Upon application, the court may issue a search warrant for the purposes requested.

[ 2006 c 157 s 3; 1999 c 291 s 6; 1996 c 189 s 1; 1994 c 143 s 209; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.100. Prior: 1949 c 168 s 5; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-34. Formerly RCW 15.36.100.]

NOTES:

Findings—2006 c 157: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Effective date—1996 c 189: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [March 28, 1996]." [ 1996 c 189 s 3.]